Hawaii statutes.
[§524-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Facility" means a multi-unit
residential building, including all operations associated therewith, used for
retirement purposes in which living units are leased for a term to last for the
lifetime of the lessee and the lessee's surviving spouse, where the living unit
is used as a residence by the lessee and the lessee's surviving spouse, and
where the living unit reverts back to the lessor upon the death of the lessee
and the lessee's surviving spouse.

"Lessee" means the person or persons
leasing a living unit in a facility. [L 1979, c 2, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next